Arkansas statutes. Title 22 Public Property
Chapter 3 Public Buildings and Other Facilities
Subchapter 12

— Public Facilities Finance Act of 1983

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 1, provided:

“(a)

The General Assembly finds:

“(1)

State government provides vital functions that impact the lives of Arkansas citizens on a daily basis;

“(2)

While these functions are important, it is equally important to ensure that state government operates efficiently and effectively to eliminate unnecessary spending of tax dollars and provide timely and quality services to Arkansas citizens; and

“(3)

Issues such as the administrative organization of a governmental entity, the appointment structure of a governmental entity's governing board, and extraneous duties assigned to governmental entities hamper the operation of state government and result in unnecessary expenses and delays in the provision of state services.

“(b)

It is the intent of this act to amend provisions of law applicable to certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commission to promote efficiency and effectiveness in the operations of state government as a whole.”

Preambles.

Acts 1987, No. 652, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, Act 458 of 1983 (the “Act”) authorized and empowered Arkansas State Building Services, with the approval of the Governor, to issue its State Building Services certificates of indebtedness in a total principal amount not to exceed twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000.00); and

“Whereas, the act authorized and empowered the State Board of Finance to purchase State Building Services certificates of indebtedness in a total principal amount not to exceed twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000.00); and

“Whereas, the issuance of State Building Services certificates of indebtedness has proved to be an efficient and economical means of providing for the construction of facilities as authorized pursuant to the Act; and Whereas, the General Assembly hereby finds that to ensure that Arkansas State Building Services has an efficient and economical means of providing for the construction of buildings as authorized pursuant to the Act, it is deemed appropriate and necessary to amend the Act to provide that the authority to issue of such State Building Services certificates of indebtedness shall be a continuing authority, subject to the limitations contained in the Act; and

“Whereas, in order to provide for the continuing authority to issue State Building Services certificates of indebtedness, the Act should be amended as hereinafter set forth;

“Now therefore….”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1983, No. 458, § 22: Mar. 15, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly hereby finds and declares the present facilities for the housing of inmates committed to, or in the custody of, the Department of Correction are not adequate; that the facilities for the housing and other activities in connection with the prison agriculture and industry programs of the Department of Correction are not adequate; that our state-supported institutions of higher education are in need of additional facilities and equipment; that there is an urgent need to undertake the acquisition, construction, repair, renovation, alteration, maintenance and equipping of existing and/or new facilities of the Department of Correction and the state-supported institutions of higher education in order for them to continue to carry out their responsibilities and obligations. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be effective upon its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 895, § 6: July 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fourth General Assembly that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two-year period; that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1983 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1983 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1983 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 112, § 6: Nov. 10, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fourth General Assembly meeting in First Extraordinary Session that uncertainty exists as to the meaning of certain provisions of Act 458 of 1983 and that clarification of the meaning of such provisions of Act 458 of 1983 is essential to the efficient operation of state government. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 652, § 6: Apr. 4, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly hereby finds and declares that a need exists to provide for a continuing method of financing the construction of facilities for the housing of inmates committed to, or in the custody of, the Department of Correction; facilities for the housing and other activities in connection with the prison agricultural and industry programs of the Department of Correction; and facilities for institutions of higher education and that there is an immediate need to provide for such continuing authority to issue State Building Services certificates of indebtedness to provide adequate financing for the construction of such facilities. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be effective upon its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 86, § 13: Jan. 2, 1990. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the recent increase in violent crimes in this state has resulted in overcrowding in the prisons and local jails; that this act will provide a funding mechanism for construction of badly needed regional jails and correction facilities; that the proper administration of the provisions of this act requires that it become effective on a day certain. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective January 2, 1990.”

Acts 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 9, § 9: Oct. 19, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly meeting in First Extraordinary Session, that the provisions of this Act are of critical importance to the operation, construction, and contracting of correctional facilities and endeavors and that the provisions of this Act are of critical importance to the safety and well being of the people of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 974: Jan. 1, 1998.

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 129: May 23, 2016. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the membership and duties of certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commissions and repeals other governmental entities; that these revisions and repeals of governmental entities impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the provisions of this act should become effective as soon as possible to allow for implementation of the new provisions in advance of the upcoming fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

22-3-1201. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Public Facilities Finance Act of 1983”.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 458, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-2601.

22-3-1202. Purpose.

It has been found by the General Assembly that adequate construction, equipping, maintenance, and operation of facilities for the Division of Correction and the state-supported institutions of higher education are essential to the well-being of this state and that the pledging of the motor vehicles safety inspection fee, the fees derived from the agriculture and livestock activities and rentals of farm properties, the fees collected from the sale or disposition of articles and products manufactured through the operations of the prison industries program, and the rental fees collected by state-supported institutions of higher education from tenants other than state agencies is essential to the fulfillment of the purposes of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 458, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-2614; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 1005.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction”.

22-3-1203. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Agency” or “state agency” means any agency, board, officer, commission, department, division, or institution of the State of Arkansas;

(2)(A)

“Building” or “buildings” means any and all buildings and related facilities constructed or acquired and equipped for the housing of inmates committed to, or in the custody of, the Division of Correction; any and all buildings and related facilities constructed, acquired, or equipped for the purpose of expanding the prison agriculture and industry programs within the Division of Correction; and any and all buildings constructed, acquired, or equipped for any state-supported institution of higher education, the construction, acquisition, or equipping of which are authorized by this subchapter.

(B)

The term “building” or “buildings” means a single building or complex of buildings or an expansion of an existing building or complex of buildings as may be determined best to serve the needs of the Division of Correction or state-supported institutions of higher education and shall refer to and include such related structures, fixtures, and facilities as may be determined to be appropriate;

(3)

“Certificates of indebtedness” means certificates of indebtedness authorized by and issued pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter;

(4)(A)

“Construct” or “construction” means to acquire, construct, reconstruct, remodel, expand, install, or equip all lands, buildings, structures, improvements, or other property, either real, personal, or mixed, which is useful in connection with the building, and to make other necessary expenditures in connection therewith by such methods and in such manner as the Building Authority Division shall determine to be necessary or desirable to accomplish the powers, purposes, and authorities set forth in this subchapter.

(B)

The term “construct” or “construction” shall be construed as including purchasing instructional equipment and major maintenance projects;

(5)

[Repealed.]

(6)

“Equip” means to install or place on or in any building or structure, or in connection with the use and operation of any building or structure, equipment of any and every kind, whether or not affixed, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, equipment used or employed in connection with the prison agriculture and industry programs; instructional equipment, materials, and books for use by any state-supported institution of higher education; and any and all library and reference books and materials;

(7)

“1977 Bonds” means the Arkansas State Building Services Department of Public Safety Revenue Bonds dated September 1, 1977, authorized by and issued under Acts 1977, No. 490;

(8)

“1979 Bonds” means the Arkansas State Building Services Department of Public Safety Revenue Bonds dated September 1, 1979, authorized by and issued under Acts 1977, No. 490;

(9)

“Pledged revenues” means all nontax revenues authorized by §22-3-1210 to be pledged for the security and payment of the certificates of indebtedness; and

(10)

“Surplus moneys” means pledged revenues plus any assets in the Public Facilities Debt Service Fund in amounts over and above that required for debt service when it comes due.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 458, §§ 2, 9; 1983, No. 895, § 3; 1983 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 112, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 13-2602, 13-2602.1, 13-2609; Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, §§ 61-63; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, §§ 61-63; 2019, No. 910, §§ 1006-1008.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1977, No. 490, referred to in this section, appears in the Title 19 Appendix.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” in (4)(A); and repealed former (6) and (12).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” twice in (2)(A) and in (2)(B); deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (4)(A); and repealed (5).

22-3-1204. Provisions exclusive and overriding.

(a)

This subchapter shall be the complete and sole authority for the establishment of the purposes set forth in this subchapter.

(b)

To the extent that there is a conflict between the purposes of this subchapter and Chapter 2 of this title, the provisions of this subchapter shall govern.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 458, § 19; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-2617.

22-3-1205. Powers of Building Authority Division generally.

(a)

In addition to the powers, purposes, and authorities set forth elsewhere in this subchapter or in other laws, the Building Authority Division is authorized and empowered to:

(1)

Acquire, construct, repair, renovate, alter, maintain, and equip existing or new buildings and capital improvements and the sites upon which they are situated for use by the Division of Correction for the housing, treatment, care, and rehabilitation of inmates committed to or in the custody of the Division of Correction;

(2)

Acquire, construct, repair, renovate, alter, maintain, and equip existing or new buildings and capital improvements and the sites upon which they are situated for use by the Division of Correction for the prison agriculture and industry programs;

(3)

Acquire, construct, repair, renovate, alter, maintain, and equip existing or new buildings and capital improvements and the sites upon which they are situated for use by state-supported institutions of higher education;

(4)

Redeem or pay and discharge, or provide therefor, the outstanding 1977 Bonds and 1979 Bonds;

(5)

Obtain the necessary funds for accomplishing its powers, purposes, and authorities from any source, including, without limitation, the proceeds of certificates of indebtedness issued under this subchapter; funds appropriated and made available under Chapter 2 of this title; and funds, if any, appropriated for the buildings defined in this subchapter;

(6)

Purchase, lease or rent, and receive the bequests or donations of, or otherwise acquire, sell, trade, or barter any property either real, personal, or mixed, and convert such property into money or other property;

(7)

Contract and be contracted with;

(8)

Apply for, receive, accept, and use any moneys and property from the United States Government, any agency, any state or governmental body or political subdivision, any public or private corporation or organization of any nature, or any individual;

(9)

Invest and reinvest any of the Building Authority Division’s moneys in securities selected by the Building Authority Division; and

(10)

Take such other action, not inconsistent with law, as may be necessary or desirable to carry out the powers, purposes, and authorities set forth in this subchapter and to carry out the intent of this subchapter.

(b)

The powers, purposes, and authorities set forth in subsection (a) of this section shall be carried out in accordance with the duly promulgated policies of the Building Authority Division, under and pursuant to Chapter 2 of this title.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 458, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-2603; Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 64; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 64; 2019, No. 910, § 1009.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” in the section heading and in the introductory language of (a); and substituted “division” for “Arkansas Building Authority Council” in (b).

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (a); and substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (a)(1) twice and in (a)(2).

22-3-1206. Plan for proposed construction — Hearings and review — Filing of financial statement.

(a)

Before certificates of indebtedness as authorized by this subchapter may be issued by the Building Authority Division and purchased by the State Board of Finance, the division shall develop a plan for all proposed construction work to be performed, the location at which the work is to be performed, and the proposed use of the improvements to be carried out under the construction, together with the estimated cost thereof, and shall file a copy thereof with the Legislative Council, the Governor, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State at least sixty (60) days prior to the issuance of the certificates of indebtedness.

(b)(1)

Upon receipt of a copy of a plan for proposed construction, the Legislative Council shall review the plan and may hold hearings in connection therewith, and upon the conclusion of the hearings and review, the Legislative Council may offer such advice to the division as it deems appropriate in accomplishing the purposes set forth in this subchapter.

(2)

Copies of the advice of the Legislative Council shall be furnished to the division, the Governor, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State for their respective review and consideration.

(3)

Nothing in this subsection is intended to prohibit or limit the authority of the division to proceed in accordance with the purposes and intent of this subchapter, but in each instance in which the division shall elect not to follow the advice of the Legislative Council, the division shall file a written statement of the reasons therefor with the Legislative Council within thirty (30) days after receiving the advice of the Legislative Council.

(4)

The Legislative Council shall report to the next following regular session of the General Assembly its advice offered to the division in performing its duties under the provisions of this subchapter and shall attach to the report any statements in writing filed with the Legislative Council by the division setting forth its reasons for not following the advice of the Legislative Council.

(c)(1)

Whenever any certificates of indebtedness are issued under the provisions of this subchapter, the division shall thereafter quarterly file with the Legislative Council a detailed financial statement reflecting all expenditures or transfers of funds, by major categories, made during the calendar quarter.

(2)

The division shall furnish the Legislative Council additional information concerning the use of funds provided in this subchapter that the Legislative Council may reasonably request.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 458, § 20; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-2618; Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 65; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 65; 2019, No. 910, § 6197.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3, in (a), substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” and “division” for “authority”.

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (a).

22-3-1207. Certificates of indebtedness — Issuance and purchase authorized.

(a)(1)

For the purpose of providing funds for the construction of buildings as authorized in this subchapter, the Director of the Building Authority Division, with the approval of the Governor and the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services, is authorized and empowered to issue, and the State Board of Finance is authorized and empowered to purchase, division certificates of indebtedness of a total principal amount not to exceed twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000).

(2)

However, this authority shall be continuing, solely for the purposes as authorized in §22-3-1205(a)(1) and (2), so long as the total outstanding principal amount of the Building Authority Division certificates of indebtedness shall not exceed, at any one time, more than twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000).

(b)

The sale and purchase price of the certificates shall be at their par value.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 458, § 4; 1983 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 112, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-2604; Acts 1987, No. 652, § 2; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 66; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 66; 2019, No. 910, § 6198.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” and “division” for “authority” in (a)(1).

The 2019 amendment, in (a)(1), substituted “Director of the Building Authority Division” for “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” and inserted “and the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services”.

22-3-1208. Certificates of indebtedness — Terms and execution.

(a)(1)

The certificates of indebtedness shall be in such form and denomination, and shall have such dates and maturities, and may be issued in such series, as the Building Authority Division shall determine.

(2)

The schedule of principal and interest maturities shall be arranged so that the aggregate amount maturing each year, except for the initial year or portion thereof, shall be equal, to the nearest hundred dollars, to each other annual installment, and that not more than twenty-one (21) years from date of issue will be required to retire all the certificates of any one (1) issue or series of certificates of indebtedness.

(b)

The certificates shall contain a provision providing for their redemption in advance of maturity, at par, in inverse number order, at the option of the division.

(c)(1)

The certificates shall bear interest from the date of issuance at the rate of eight and one-half percent (8½%) per annum, payable semiannually on January 1 and July 1; the payment of the interest is to be evidenced by endorsement on the certificates by the Treasurer of State.

(2)

Payment of the principal of and interest on the certificates shall be made in lawful money of the United States at the office of the Treasurer of State.

(d)

The certificates of indebtedness shall be executed on behalf of the division by the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 458, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-2605; Acts 1987, No. 652, § 3; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 67; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 67; 2019, No. 910, §§ 6199, 6200.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” in (a)(1); substituted “division” for “authority” at the end of (b); and rewrote (d).

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (a)(1); and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (d).

22-3-1209. Certificates of indebtedness — Pledge of revenues and restrictions generally.

(a)

The certificates shall be the obligations of the Building Authority Division, and the nontax revenues available to the division under the provisions of §22-3-1210, as distinguished from any tax moneys which may be made available for the operation of the division, are pledged to secure the payment of the certificates.

(b)

The certificates shall contain a provision that neither the faith nor credit of the State of Arkansas nor any of its revenues are pledged to the payment of the certificates and that the debt is not the obligation of the division.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 458, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-2604; Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 68; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 68; 2019, No. 910, § 6201.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3, in (a),
substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” and “division” for “authority” twice; and substituted “division” for “individual members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council nor of the Director of the Arkansas Building Authority” at the end of (b).

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (a).

22-3-1210. Certificates of indebtedness — Public Facilities Debt Service Fund.

(a)

The principal of and interest on the certificates of indebtedness issued under this subchapter shall be secured, except as stated in subdivision (c)(1) of this section, by a lien on and pledge of:

(1)

All revenue derived from payments by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority pursuant to §22-3-1225(b) which is a portion of the funds received by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority from the sale of certificates for the inspection of motor vehicles;

(2)

All moneys from the sale of or disposition of farm products, livestock, or other products produced in connection with the agriculture and livestock activities at any institution under the control of the Board of Corrections or any successor entity, excluding those moneys that may be accountable from, or the value of, products consumed within the Division of Correction and from rental of farm properties under the control of the board or any successor entity;

(3)

All moneys from the sale or disposition of articles and products manufactured or produced by prison labor through the operations of the prison industry program, excluding those moneys that may be accountable from, or the value of, articles and products used or consumed within the Division of Correction; and

(4)

Fifty percent (50%) of the gross revenue, if any, derived from the leasing or renting to tenants, other than state agencies, of space in any new facility constructed or acquired with proceeds of any certificates issued under this subchapter.

(b)

The pledging of the revenues enumerated in subsection (a) of this section, which are, collectively, the pledged revenues, is authorized. All pledged revenues are specifically declared to be nontax revenues restricted in their use and dedicated to be used solely as provided and authorized in this subchapter.

(c)(1)(A)

Moneys described in subdivision (a)(2) of this section are declared to be cash funds restricted in their use and dedicated and are to be used solely as authorized in §15-5-213. The cash funds when received by the Division of Correction shall not be deposited into or deemed to be a part of the State Treasury for purposes of Arkansas Constitution, Article 5, § 29, Arkansas Constitution, Article 16, § 12, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 20, or any other constitutional or statutory provision related thereto. The Division of Correction shall pay such cash funds to the Arkansas Development Finance Authority for deposit into the Correction Facilities Privatization Account of the Correction Facilities Construction Fund for the purposes authorized by §15-5-213. The cash funds described in this subsection shall not be subject to appropriation to the extent required for debt service.

(B)

Commencing on the first day of the month next succeeding the issuance of certificates of indebtedness under this subchapter, but not before July 1, 1983, and so long as any certificates are outstanding under this subchapter, the pledged revenues, except as provided herein, shall be deposited into the State Treasury as and when received by the Division of Correction, by the Building Authority Division, by state-supported institutions of higher education, or by any other state agency, as the case may be, to the credit of a fund to be designated the “Public Facilities Debt Service Fund”.

(2)

So long as any certificates of indebtedness are outstanding under this subchapter, all moneys in the Public Facilities Debt Service Fund shall be used solely for payment and redemption of the outstanding 1977 Bonds and the 1979 Bonds, as authorized in this subchapter, for the payment of the principal of and interest on the certificates of indebtedness as authorized in this subchapter, for transfer of such amounts designated in subsection (a) of this section from time to time, as deemed necessary by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, to the Correction Facilities Privatization Account of the Correction Facilities Construction Fund established in §15-5-213, and for the transfer of surplus moneys as defined in the authorizing resolution in the State Treasury for credit to the designated Division of Correction funds, in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter.

(d)(1)

The principal of and interest on the certificates of indebtedness shall be payable solely from the Public Facilities Debt Service Fund and from the moneys required by this subchapter to be deposited into the Public Facilities Debt Service Fund.

(2)

The Building Authority Division is directed to insert appropriate provisions in the authorizing resolution for the investing and reinvesting of moneys in the Public Facilities Debt Service Fund in securities selected by the Building Authority Division, and all income derived therefrom shall be and become a part of the Public Facilities Debt Service Fund.

(e)

So long as there are outstanding certificates of indebtedness issued under this subchapter, the General Assembly may eliminate or change any source of revenue pledged in connection with the certificates but only on the condition that there is always maintained in effect and made available for the payment of outstanding certificates sources of nontax revenues and fees which produce revenues, as distinguished from tax revenues, at least sufficient in amount to provide for the payment when due of the principal of and interest on the outstanding certificates of indebtedness and to comply with all covenants provided in this subchapter.

(f)

Nothing in this section is intended to prohibit the Building Authority Division from investing moneys received under this section, as provided in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 458, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-2609; Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 86, § 2; 1995 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 9, § 1; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 69; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 69; Acts 2019, No. 910, §§ 1010-1012, 6202.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 86, § 1, provided:

“The General Assembly of the state of Arkansas hereby finds and declares that it is critical for the state to find methods to obtain additional correction facilities and regional jails for use by the Arkansas Department of Correction and the cities and counties within the state in order to alleviate severe jail overcrowding. It has also determined that it is in the best interest of the state to provide a means by which the Arkansas Development Finance Authority can finance the construction and equipping of such correction and jail facilities and to provide a source of cash funds to the Authority to be used solely for such purposes.”

Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 86, § 9, provided:

“Nothing in this act shall be construed to prohibit any other source of financing or funding, either public or private, for the construction of correction facilities and regional jails.”

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3, in (a),
substituted “Department of Correction” for “department” in (a)(3), twice in (c)(1)(A), and in (c)(1)(B) and (c)(2); substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” in (c)(1)(B); and substituted “division” for “Arkansas Building Authority” twice in (d)(2) and in (f).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (a)(2),
(a)(3), (c)(1)(A) twice, (c)(1)(B), and (c)(2); deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (c)(1)(B); and substituted “Building Authority Division” for “division” in (f).

22-3-1211. Certificates of indebtedness — Tax exemption.

Certificates of indebtedness issued under the provisions of this subchapter, and the interest thereon, shall be exempt from all state, county, and municipal taxes. This exemption shall include income, property, inheritance, and estate taxes.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 458, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-2615.

22-3-1212. Certificates of indebtedness — Funds used for purchase — Retirement.

(a)(1)

The state funds which may be used by the State Board of Finance in making the purchases of the certificates of indebtedness are those specifically referred to under the provisions of the State Treasury Management Law, §19-3-501 et seq.

(2)

All certificates purchased or received shall be held in trust for the use and benefit of the various state funds used in the purchase.

(b)

With respect to each certificate of indebtedness, at maturity thereof, the Treasurer of State shall:

(1)

Withdraw the certificate from the Securities Account, charge the Securities Account with the principal thereof, and cancel the certificate;

(2)

Withdraw from the Public Facilities Debt Service Fund established by this subchapter the aggregate amount of principal and interest then due on the certificate;

(3)

Deposit into the State Treasury to the credit of the Cash Account that part of the aggregate amount representing the principal indebtedness evidenced by the certificate; and

(4)

Deposit into the Securities Reserve Fund, as nonrevenue receipts, that part of the aggregate amount representing interest then due on the certificate.

(c)

The certificates of indebtedness which have been paid and cancelled by the Treasurer of State shall be delivered to the Building Authority Division.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 458, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-2607; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6203.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (c).

22-3-1213. Certificates of indebtedness — Alternative method of payment.

(a)

In the event it shall be determined that the procedure set forth in §22-3-1212 for the retirement of the certificates is unconstitutional or invalid for any reason, the Building Authority Division is authorized and directed to establish an account in its name in a bank to be approved by the State Board of Finance and to deposit therein so much of the first moneys received by it each year under the provisions of §22-3-1210 as shall be required to meet the next ensuing principal and interest maturities of its outstanding certificates, together with such additional amounts as may be necessary to pay any certificates which it shall determine to retire in advance of maturity.

(b)

The division is authorized and directed to reimburse the funds so deposited for the purpose of paying the principal of and interest on the division's outstanding certificates of indebtedness authorized under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 458, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-2608; Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 70; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 70; 2019, No. 910, § 6204.

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” in (a); and, in (b), substituted “division” for “authority” and “the division's” for “its”.

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (a).

22-3-1214. Certificates of indebtedness — Disposition of proceeds.

Proceeds from the sale of the certificates of indebtedness shall be deposited into the State Treasury as follows:

(1)

All funds held as a debt service reserve fund in the Public Facilities Debt Service Fund pursuant to the provisions hereof and the earnings thereon shall be applied on or after January 2, 1990, to redeem, to the extent possible, certificates of indebtedness identified as Series B; and

(2)

The remainder thereof shall be credited as trust funds to the “Public Facilities Construction Fund”, which is established by this subdivision (2), and shall be used only for the redemption of the 1977 Bonds and the 1979 Bonds and for the construction of buildings authorized under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 458, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-2606; Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 86, § 3.

Publisher's Notes.

As to legislative finding and declaration of Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 86, see Publisher's Notes, §22-3-1210.

As to construction of Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 86, see Publisher's Notes, §22-3-1210.

22-3-1215. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning outstanding bonds, pledged revenues, discharge and the effect of election not to redeem, was repealed by Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 86, § 10. The section was derived from Acts 1983, No. 458, §§ 9, 10; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 13-2609, 13-2610.